vi: Kiểu ngực áo khoác: Hai hàng khuy; Một hàng khuy; Khác
pl: Styl kurtki na piersi: Dwurzędowa; Jednorzędowa; Inny
ja: ジャケット胸スタイル: ダブルブレスト; シングルブレスト; その他
ru: Тип борта пиджака: Двубортный; Однобортный; Другое
th: รูปแบบกระดุมเสื้อสูท: กระดุมสองแถว; กระดุมแถวเดียว; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Modelul pieptului sacoului: La două rânduri de nasturi; La un rând de nasturi; Altele
fr: Type de boutonnage de la veste: Croisé; Droit; Autre
ko: 재킷 가슴 스타일: 더블 브레스티드; 싱글 브레스티드; 기타
sv: Bröstmodell för jacka: Dubbelknäppt; Enkelknäppt; Annat
de: Bruststil des Sakkos: Zweireihig; Einreihig; Sonstige
hr-HR: Stil prsa jakne: S dvostrukim kopčanjem; S jednostrukim kopčanjem; Ostalo
sk-SK: Spôsob zapínania saka v oblasti hrudníka: Dvojradové; Jednoradové; Iné
zh-CN: 西装上衣襟型: 双排扣; 单排扣; 其他
hu: A kabát mellrészének kialakítása: Kétsoros gombolású; Egysoros gombolású; Egyéb
el: Στυλ κουμπώματος σακακιού: Σταυρωτό; Μονόπετο; Άλλο
cs: Styl saka: Dvouřadé; Jednořadé; Jiné
zh-TW: 西裝外套排扣樣式: 雙排釦; 單排釦; 其他
pt-BR: Paletó estilo de abotoamento: Abotoamento duplo; Abotoamento simples; Outros
nb: Jakkestil i brystet: Dobbeltspent; Enkeltspent; Annet
fi: Takinrinnuksen malli: Kaksirivinen; Yksirivinen; Muu
en: Jacket breast style: Double-breasted; Single-breasted; Other
sl-SI: Stil zapenjanja suknjiča: Dvoredno zapenjanje; Enoredno zapenjanje; Drugo
bg-BG: Стил на предницата на сакото: Двуредно; Едноредно; Друго
lt-LT: Švarko užsegimo stilius: Dvieilis; Vienaeilis; Kita
it: Stile del petto della giacca: Doppiopetto; Monopetto; Altro
da: Jakkens bryststil: Dobbeltradet; Enkeltradet; Andet
nl: Colbert borststijl: Double-breasted; Single-breasted; Overig
pt-PT: Estilo dos botões do casaco: Traçado; Abotoamento simples; Outro
tr: Ceket göğüs stili: Kruvaze; Tek sıra düğmeli; Diğer
es: Estilo de la parte frontal del saco: Cruzado; Sencillo; Otro